Vermont, session 2025-2026, H347.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 383 is amended to read:
§ 383. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor or designee.
(2) “Employee” means any individual employed or permitted to work by
an employer except:
(A) any individual employed in agriculture, provided the individual is
the agricultural employer’s parent, spouse, or child;
(B) any individual employed in domestic service in or about a private
home; [Repealed.]
(C) any individual employed by the United States;
(D) any individual employed in the activities of a public supported
nonprofit organization, except laundry employees, nurses’ aides, or practical
nurses;
(E) any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative,
or professional capacity;
(F) any individual making home deliveries of newspapers or
advertising;
VT LEG #379441 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.347
2025 Page 3 of 6
(G) taxi-cab drivers;
(H) outside salespersons; and
(I) students working during all or any part of the school year or
regular vacation periods.
(3) “Employer” means any person that employs two or more employees.
(4) “Occupation” means an industry, trade, or business or branch thereof
or class of work in which workers are gainfully employed.
(5) An “individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, or
professional capacity” means an individual who is paid a salary at least equal
to $1,128,00.00 per week as of January 1, 2026. On each subsequent January
1, the salary threshold shall be increased by five percent or the percentage
increase of the Consumer Price Index, CPI-U, U.S. city average, not seasonally
adjusted, or successor index, as calculated by the U.S. Department of Labor or
successor agency for the 12 months preceding the previous September 1,
whichever is smaller, but in no event shall the salary threshold be decreased.
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 384 is amended to read:
§ 384. EMPLOYMENT; WAGES
(a)(1) Beginning on January 1, 2022 2026, an employer shall not employ
any employee at a rate of less than $12.55 $20.00 per hour, and on each
subsequent January 1, the minimum wage rate shall be increased by five
percent or the percentage increase of the Consumer Price Index, CPI-U, U.S.
VT LEG #379441 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.347
2025 Page 4 of 6
city average, not seasonally adjusted, or successor index, as calculated by the
U.S. Department of Labor or successor agency for the 12 months preceding the
previous September 1, whichever is smaller, but in no event shall the minimum
wage be decreased. The minimum wage shall be rounded off to the nearest
$0.01.
(2) An employer in the hotel, motel, tourist place, and restaurant
industry shall not employ a service or tipped employee at a basic wage rate less
than one-half the minimum wage. Beginning on January 1, 2026, an employer
shall not employ a service or tipped employee at a basic wage of less than the
minimum wage established pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection. As
used in this subdivision, “a service or tipped employee” means an employee of
a hotel, motel, tourist place, or restaurant who customarily and regularly
receives more than $120.00 per month in tips for direct and personal customer
service.
(3) If the minimum wage rate established by the U.S. government is
greater than the rate established pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection
for any year, the minimum wage rate for that year shall be the rate established
by the U.S. government.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an employer shall not
pay an employee less than one and one-half times the regular wage rate for any
VT LEG #379441 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.347
2025 Page 5 of 6
work done by the employee in excess of 40 hours during a workweek.
However, this subsection shall not apply to:
* * *
(9)(A) Any individual employed in agriculture, provided the employee
receives not less than one and one-half times the regular wage rate for any
work done by the employee:
(i) in excess of 60 hours per week, effective January 1, 2026;
(ii) in excess of 56 hours per week, effective January 1, 2028;
(iii) in excess of 52 hours per week, effective January 1, 2030;
(iv) in excess of 48 hours per week, effective January 1, 2032;
(v) in excess of 44 hours per week, effective January 1, 2034; and
(vi) in excess of 40 hours per week, effective January 1, 2036.
(B) This subdivision (9) shall not apply if the individual is the
agricultural employer’s parent, spouse, or child.
* * *
Sec. 3. 21 V.S.A. § 385 is amended to read:
§ 385. ADMINISTRATION
The Commissioner and the Commissioner’s authorized representatives have
full power and authority for all the following:
* * *
VT LEG #379441 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.347
2025 Page 6 of 6
(5) To recommend a suitable scale of rates for learners, and apprentices,
and persons with disabilities, which may be less than the regular minimum
wage rate for experienced workers without disabilities.
Sec. 4. 2019 Acts and Resolves No. 85, Sec. 11 is amended to read:
Sec. 11. REPEALS
(a) 3 V.S.A. § 222d is repealed.
(b) 21 V.S.A. §§ 346, 387, 712, and 1379 are repealed.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379441 v.1